District of Columbia statutes.
3-510

Repealed

Hearing procedures.

Repealed.

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 11, 29 DCR 5297
Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 101(a), 55 DCR 9186
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 401(a), 61 DCR 1184